Illinois, session 104th, HB1591.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Park District Code is amended by changing 5Section 2-11 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 1205/2-11)  (from Ch. 105, par. 2-11)7    Sec. 2-11. No person shall be eligible to serve as park 8commissioner unless that person is a qualified elector of the 9park district and has resided therein at least one year prior 10to election or appointment.11    A person is not eligible to serve as park commissioner if 12that person is in arrears in the payment of a tax or other 13indebtedness due to the park district or has been convicted in 14any court located in the United States of any infamous crime, 15bribery, perjury, or other felony. 16    Nominations of candidates for the office of park 17commissioners in any General Park District at all succeeding 18elections shall be made by petition signed in the aggregate 19for each candidate by qualified voters of such district, equal 20in number to not less than 2% of the number who voted at the 21last preceding election for commissioners in such district, 22but in no case by less than 25 of such voters. Notwithstanding 23any other provisions of this Section, no candidate shall be   HB1591- 2 -LRB104 08308 RTM 18359 b1required to file more than 300 petition signatures from such 2voters. The petition shall be filed with the secretary of the 3district. 4In all General Park Districts the secretary of the district 5shall, in the manner and at the time prescribed by the general 6election law certify to the proper election authorities the 7name or names of the candidate or candidates so nominated. The 8ballot shall have no political party name, platform or 9principle thereon designated, nor shall any party circle be 10printed upon the ballot. Where voting machines or electronic 11voting systems are used, the provisions of this Section may be 12modified as required or authorized by the general election 13law.14(Source: P.A. 96-458, eff. 8-14-09.)